Maryland, session 2026, SB0802.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Alcoholic Beverages and Cannabis
21–102.
This title applies only in Garrett County.
– 1 –

Ch. 827 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
21–202.
(a) (1) The Governor shall appoint three members to the Board AND ONE
SUBSTITUTE MEMBER.
(2) The appointments shall be made:
(i) if there is a resident Senator elected from the county, with the
advice and consent of the Senate; or
(ii) if there is no resident Senator elected from the county, with
confirmation by the House of Delegates.
(b) (1) Each member of the Board shall be:
(i) a resident and voter of the county; and
(ii) an individual of high character and integrity and of recognized
business capacity.
(2) An individual who is receiving compensation from the county may not
be appointed to the Board.
(3) (i) Two members of the Board shall be members of the same political
party as that of a majority of the members of the Board of County Commissioners.
(ii) One member of the Board shall be a member of a political party
other than the one represented by a majority of the Board of County Commissioners.
(4) THE SUBSTITUTE MEMBER:
(I) MAY SERVE ON THE BOARD IN THE ABSENCE OF A QUORUM
OF THE REGULAR MEMBERS DUE TO ILLNESS OR CONFLICT OF INTEREST; AND
(II) HAS ALL OF THE POWERS AND DUTIES OF A REGULAR
MEMBER WHEN SERVING ON THE BOARD.
21–204.
(a) (1) Subject to paragraph (2) of this subsection, the Board shall meet at least
once each month.
(2) The chair may cancel a meeting for lack of an agenda.
– 2 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 827
(b) (1) In accordance with § 32.44 of the Garrett County Code of Ordinances,
the County Commissioners shall set the salaries of the members of the Board, INCLUDING
THE SUBSTITUTE MEMBER.
(2) When attending meetings, each member is entitled to reimbursement
for expenses under the Standard State Travel Regulations, as provided in the State budget.
(c) The County Commissioners shall provide to the Board:
(1) administrative, clerical, and accounting services as needed; and
(2) (i) legal counsel through the office of the County Attorney; or
(ii) funds for the payment for competent private legal counsel.
21–401.
(a) The following sections of Title 2, Subtitle 2 (“Manufacturer’s Licenses”) of
Division I of this article apply in the county without exception or variation:
(1) § 2–201 (“Issuance by Comptroller”);
(2) [§ 2–205 (“Class 3 winery license”);
(3)] § 2–207 (“Class 5 brewery license”);
[(4)] (3) § 2–209 (“Class 7 micro–brewery license”);
[(5)] (4) § 2–211 (“Residency requirement”);
[(6)] (5) § 2–212 (“Additional licenses”);
[(7)] (6) § 2–213 (“Additional fees”);
[(8)] (7) § 2–214 (“Sale or delivery restricted”);
[(9)] (8) § 2–215 (“Beer sale on credit to retail dealer prohibited”);
[(10)] (9) § 2–216 (“Interaction between manufacturing entities and
retailers”);
[(11)] (10) § 2–217 (“Distribution of alcoholic beverages – Prohibited
practices”); and
– 3 –

Ch. 827 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
[(12)] (11) § 2–218 (“Restrictive agreements between producers and
retailers – Prohibited”).
(b) The following sections of Title 2, Subtitle 2 (“Manufacturer’s Licenses”) of
Division I of this article apply in the county:
(1) § 2–202 (“Class 1 distillery license”), subject to § 21–403 of this subtitle;
(2) § 2–203 (“Class 9 limited distillery license”), subject to § 21–403.1 of
this subtitle;
(3) § 2–204 (“Class 2 rectifying license”), subject to § 21–404 of this subtitle;
(4) § 2–205 (“CLASS 3 WINERY LICENSE”), SUBJECT TO § 21–405.1 OF
THIS SUBTITLE;
(5) § 2–206 (“Class 4 limited winery license”), subject to [§ 21–405] §§
21–405 AND 21–405.1 of this subtitle;
[(5)] (6) § 2–208 (“Class 6 pub–brewery license”), subject to § 21–406 of
this subtitle; and
[(6)] (7) § 2–210 (“Class 8 farm brewery license”), subject to § 21–407 of
this subtitle.
21–405.1.
(A) THERE IS A SPECIAL EVENT PERMIT.
(B) THE BOARD MAY ISSUE THE PERMIT TO A HOLDER OF A CLASS 3 WINERY
LICENSE OR A CLASS 4 LIMITED WINERY LICENSE.
(C) THE PERMIT AUTHORIZES THE HOLDER TO SELL FOR ON–PREMISES
CONSUMPTION BEER, WINE PRODUCED BY THE HOLDER, SPARKLING WINE THAT IS
NATURALLY OR ARTIFICIALLY CARBONATED, AND LIQUOR AT A PRIVATE EVENT FOR
WHICH THE ENTIRE LICENSED PREMISES HAS BEEN RENTED.
(D) (1) THE PERMIT SHALL BE USED FOR PRIVATE PARTIES THAT ARE
SCHEDULED AND RESERVED AT LEAST 7 DAYS IN ADVANCE OF THE ACTUAL EVENT.
(2) THE PERMIT HOLDER MAY PROVIDE THE FOLLOWING SERVICES
FOR A PRIVATE EVENT:
– 4 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 827
(I) FOOD AND BEVERAGE SERVICE, INCLUDING THE USE OF A
LICENSED KITCHEN AND BAR FACILITY FOR PREPARING AND SERVING MEALS AND
BEVERAGES ON THE PREMISES;
(II) SEATING ACCOMMODATIONS, INCLUDING TABLES FOR
ON–PREMISES MEAL SERVICE; AND
(III) AN ASSEMBLY AREA THAT COMPLIES WITH THE STATE’S
FIRE CODE.
(E) THE PERMIT HOLDER MAY NOT:
(1) HAVE A DIRECT OR INDIRECT PECUNIARY INTEREST IN THE
LICENSED CATERER OR OTHER CONTRACTED PARTY; AND
(2) ALLOW THE GENERAL PUBLIC TO ENTER ANY PART OF THE
LICENSED PREMISES WHILE THE PRIVATE EVENT IS BEING HELD.
(F) THE PERMIT HOLDER SHALL PURCHASE BEER, SPARKLING WINE THAT
IS NATURALLY OR ARTIFICIALLY CARBONATED, OR LIQUOR INTENDED FOR SALE
UNDER THE PERMIT FROM A LICENSED ALCOHOLIC BEVERAGES RETAILER LOCATED
IN THE COUNTY.
(G) (1) THE PERMIT HOLDER SHALL KEEP ALL RECEIPTS FROM
PURCHASES OF ALCOHOLIC BEVERAGES FOR 1 YEAR AFTER THE DATE OF
PURCHASE.
(2) THE RECEIPTS SHALL BE MADE AVAILABLE FOR INSPECTION BY
THE BOARD.
(H) A PERMIT HOLDER THAT INTENDS TO USE THE PERMIT SHALL NOTIFY
THE BOARD AT LEAST 7 DAYS BEFORE THE EVENT IS TO OCCUR ON A FORM
PROVIDED BY THE BOARD.
(I) THE PERMIT HOLDER SHALL ENSURE THAT:
(1) SERVICE PERSONNEL, INCLUDING BARTENDERS AND WAIT STAFF,
ARE PRESENT AT ALL TIMES DURING THE PRIVATE EVENT WHEN FOOD OR
ALCOHOLIC BEVERAGES ARE AVAILABLE; AND
(2) AT LEAST ONE PERMIT HOLDER OR ONE EMPLOYEE WHO IS
CERTIFIED BY AN APPROVED ALCOHOL AWARENESS PROGRAM UNDER § 4–505 OF
THIS ARTICLE IS ON THE PREMISES WHILE ALCOHOLIC BEVERAGES ARE AVAILABLE.
– 5 –

Ch. 827 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(J) (1) THE PERMIT HOLDER MAY USE THE PERMIT NOT MORE THAN 32
TIMES IN A CALENDAR YEAR.
(2) A PRIVATE EVENT MAY EXTEND UP TO 7 DAYS IF THE EVENT IS FOR
THE SAME CLIENT.
(K) (1) A PRIVATE EVENT MAY BE HELD MONDAYS THROUGH SATURDAYS
FROM 6 A.M. TO 2 A.M. THE FOLLOWING DAY.
(2) SUNDAY SALES ARE ALLOWED FROM 6 A.M. TO MIDNIGHT IN:
(I) COUNTY ELECTION DISTRICTS 11 AND 15; AND
(II) ANY OTHER COUNTY ELECTION DISTRICT OR PRECINCT OF
A COUNTY ELECTION DISTRICT IN WHICH THE VOTERS IN A REFERENDUM
AUTHORIZED BY LAW APPROVE SUNDAY SALES AS SPECIFIED IN THIS PARAGRAPH.
(L) THE PERMIT HOLDER MAY NOT STORE ALCOHOLIC BEVERAGES THAT
ARE NOT PRODUCED BY THE PERMIT HOLDER ON THE MANUFACTURER’S LICENSED
PREMISES IN BETWEEN EVENTS.
(M) (1) THE ANNUAL PERMIT FEE IS $1,750.
(2) THE BOARD SHALL CHARGE A ONE–TIME ISSUING FEE FOR A NEW
PERMIT IN AN AMOUNT EQUAL TO THE ANNUAL PERMIT FEE.
21–602.
(a) There is a Class B beer license.
(b) The license authorizes the license holder to sell beer for on– or off–premises
consumption:
(1) at a hotel, a motel, or an inn that:
(i) accommodates the public;
(ii) provides services ordinarily found in hotels, motels, or inns;
(iii) is equipped with at least 10 bedrooms for public accommodation;
and
(iv) has a lobby with a registration and mail desk, and seating; or
– 6 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 827
(2) a restaurant that:
(i) has seating at tables, not including bars or counters, for at least
20 individuals; and
(ii) can prepare and serve full–course meals for at least 20
individuals at one seating.
(c) (1) The Board may issue the license with or without a catering option.
(2) A license holder with a catering option may sell beer for consumption
at events that the holder caters off the licensed premises ANYWHERE IN THE COUNTY TO
A PERSON OF LEGAL DRINKING AGE ON PREMISES THAT EITHER DO NOT HAVE A
LICENSE OR HAVE A TEMPORARY LICENSE ISSUED BY THE BOARD.
(3) To exercise the catering option, the license holder:
(i) shall provide food if the holder provides beer at a catered event
off the licensed premises; and
(ii) may exercise the catering option only during the hours and days
that are allowed under the license.
(4) AT EACH CATERED EVENT WHERE BEER IS SERVED, THE HOLDER
OF THE CATERING OPTION SHALL:
(I) SUPPLY SERVICE PERSONNEL, INCLUDING BARTENDERS
AND WAIT STAFF;
(II) ENSURE THAT THE SERVICE PERSONNEL ARE PRESENT AT
ALL TIMES DURING THE CATERED EVENT; AND
(III) HAVE AT LEAST ONE PERSON AT THE CATERED EVENT WHO
IS CERTIFIED BY AN ALCOHOL AWARENESS PROGRAM UNDER § 4–505 OF THIS
ARTICLE.
(d) The annual license fees are:
(1) $150 for a 6–day license without a catering option;
(2) $250 for a 6–day license with a catering option;
(3) $175 for a 7–day license without a catering option; and
– 7 –

Ch. 827 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(4) $275 for a 7–day license with a catering option.
(e) The Board shall charge a one–time issuing fee for a new license in an amount
equal to the annual license fee.
21–803.
(a) There is a Class B beer and wine license.
(b) (1) The Board may issue the license for use in:
(i) a hotel, a motel, or an inn that:
1. provides services ordinarily found in a hotel, a motel, or an
inn;
2. is equipped with at least 10 bedrooms for public
accommodation; and
3. has a lobby with a registration and mail desk and seating
facilities; or
(ii) a restaurant that:
1. has seating at tables, not including seats at bars or
counters, for at least 20 individuals; and
2. can prepare and serve full–course meals for at least 20
individuals at one seating.
(2) The license authorizes the license holder to sell, at retail, at the place
described in the license:
(i) beer and wine for on–premises consumption; and
(ii) beer for off–premises consumption.
(c) (1) The Board may issue the license with a catering option.
(2) In addition to exercising the privileges stated in subsection (b)(2) of this
section, a holder of a license with a catering option may sell beer and wine for consumption
at events that the license holder caters off the licensed premises ANYWHERE IN THE
COUNTY TO A PERSON OF LEGAL DRINKING AGE ON PREMISES THAT EITHER DO NOT
HAVE A LICENSE OR HAVE A TEMPORARY LICENSE ISSUED BY THE BOARD.
– 8 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 827
(3) To exercise the catering option, the license holder shall provide food at
the catered event.
(4) The license holder may exercise the catering option only during the
hours and days that are allowed under the license.
(5) AT EACH CATERED EVENT WHERE ALCOHOLIC BEVERAGES ARE
SERVED, THE HOLDER OF THE CATERING OPTION SHALL:
(I) SUPPLY SERVICE PERSONNEL, INCLUDING BARTENDERS
AND WAIT STAFF;
(II) ENSURE THAT THE SERVICE PERSONNEL ARE PRESENT AT
ALL TIMES DURING THE CATERED EVENT; AND
(III) HAVE AT LEAST ONE PERSON AT THE CATERED EVENT WHO
IS CERTIFIED BY AN ALCOHOL AWARENESS PROGRAM UNDER § 4–505 OF THIS
ARTICLE.
(d) The annual license fees are:
(1) $350 for a 6–day license without a catering option;
(2) $475 for a 6–day license with a catering option;
(3) $410 for a 7–day license without a catering option; and
(4) $535 for a 7–day license with a catering option.
(e) The Board shall charge a one–time issuing fee for a new license in an amount
equal to the annual license fee.
21–804.
(a) There is a Class BDR (deluxe restaurant) beer and wine license.
(b) The license may be issued to a holder of:
(1) any Class B alcoholic beverages license issued by the Board; or
(2) an equivalent license that the local licensing board of a different
jurisdiction issues only for use by a restaurant.
(c) (1) The Board may issue the license for use by a deluxe restaurant, as
defined in the regulations of the Board, that:
– 9 –

Ch. 827 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(i) has seating for at least 20 individuals; and
(ii) has a minimum capital investment of $25,000 for the restaurant
facilities, not including the cost of land or buildings.
(2) If the applicant purchases or leases an existing building, the capital
investment attributable to the cost of the land and improvements shall be based on the
assessed value of the land and improvements in accordance with the records of the State
Department of Assessments and Taxation at the time of purchase.
(3) The license authorizes the license holder to sell, at retail, at the place
described in the license:
(i) beer and wine for on–premises consumption; and
(ii) beer for off–premises consumption.
(d) (1) The Board may issue the license with a catering option.
(2) In addition to exercising the privileges stated in subsection (c)(3) of this
section, a holder of a license with a catering option may sell beer and wine for consumption
at events that the license holder caters off the licensed premises ANYWHERE IN THE
COUNTY TO A PERSON OF LEGAL DRINKING AGE ON PREMISES THAT EITHER DO NOT
HAVE A LICENSE OR HAVE A TEMPORARY LICENSE ISSUED BY THE BOARD.
(3) To exercise the catering option, the license holder shall provide food at
the catered event.
(4) The license holder may exercise the catering option only during the
hours and days that the Board allows.
(5) AT EACH CATERED EVENT WHERE ALCOHOLIC BEVERAGES ARE
SERVED, THE HOLDER OF THE CATERING OPTION SHALL:
(I) SUPPLY SERVICE PERSONNEL, INCLUDING BARTENDERS
AND WAIT STAFF;
(II) ENSURE THAT THE SERVICE PERSONNEL ARE PRESENT AT
ALL TIMES DURING THE CATERED EVENT; AND
(III) HAVE AT LEAST ONE PERSON AT THE CATERED EVENT WHO
IS CERTIFIED BY AN ALCOHOL AWARENESS PROGRAM UNDER § 4–505 OF THIS
ARTICLE.
– 10 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 827
(e) The annual license fees are:
(1) $500 for a 6–day license without a catering option;
(2) $625 for a 6–day license with a catering option;
(3) $585 for a 7–day license without a catering option; and
(4) $710 for a 7–day license with a catering option.
(f) The Board shall charge a one–time issuing fee for a new license in an amount
equal to the annual license fee.
21–804.1.
(a) There is a Class BDR–DC (deluxe complex restaurant) beer and wine license.
(b) The license may be issued to a holder of:
(1) any Class B alcoholic beverages license issued by the Board; or
(2) an equivalent license that the local licensing board of a different
jurisdiction issues only for use by a restaurant.
(c) (1) The Board may issue the license for use by a deluxe complex restaurant,
as defined in the regulations of the Board, that:
(i) has seating for at least 20 individuals; and
(ii) has a minimum capital investment of $25,000 for the restaurant
facilities, not including the cost of land or buildings.
(2) If the applicant purchases or leases an existing building, the capital
investment attributable to the cost of the land and improvements shall be based on the
assessed value of the land and improvements in accordance with the records of the State
Department of Assessments and Taxation at the time of purchase.
(3) The license authorizes the license holder to sell, at retail, at the place
described in the license:
(i) beer and wine for on–premises consumption; and
(ii) beer for off–premises consumption.
(d) (1) The Board may issue the license with a catering option.
– 11 –

Ch. 827 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(2) In addition to exercising the privileges stated in subsection (c)(3) of this
section, a holder of a license with a catering option may sell beer and wine for consumption
at events that the license holder caters off the licensed premises ANYWHERE IN THE
COUNTY TO A PERSON OF LEGAL DRINKING AGE ON PREMISES THAT EITHER DO NOT
HAVE A LICENSE OR HAVE A TEMPORARY LICENSE ISSUED BY THE BOARD.
(3) To exercise the catering option, the license holder shall provide food at
the catered event.
(4) The license holder may exercise the catering option only during the
hours and days that the Board allows.
(5) AT EACH CATERED EVENT WHERE ALCOHOLIC BEVERAGES ARE
SERVED, THE HOLDER OF THE CATERING OPTION SHALL:
(I) SUPPLY SERVICE PERSONNEL, INCLUDING BARTENDERS
AND WAIT STAFF;
(II) ENSURE THAT THE SERVICE PERSONNEL ARE PRESENT AT
ALL TIMES DURING THE CATERED EVENT; AND
(III) HAVE AT LEAST ONE PERSON AT THE CATERED EVENT WHO
IS CERTIFIED BY AN ALCOHOL AWARENESS PROGRAM UNDER § 4–505 OF THIS
ARTICLE.
(e) The annual license fees are:
(1) $500 for a 6–day license without a catering option;
(2) $625 for a 6–day license with a catering option;
(3) $585 for a 7–day license without a catering option; and
(4) $710 for a 7–day license with a catering option.
(f) The Board shall:
(1) charge a one–time issuing fee for a new license in an amount equal to
the annual license fee; and
(2) adopt regulations to carry out this section.
21–806.
(a) There is a Class D beer and wine license.
– 12 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 827
(b) The license authorizes the license holder to sell beer and wine, at retail, at the
place described in the license, for on– and off–premises consumption.
(c) (1) The Board may issue the license with a catering option.
(2) In addition to exercising the privileges stated in subsection (b) of this
section, a holder of a license with a catering option may sell beer and wine for consumption
at events that the license holder caters off the licensed premises ANYWHERE IN THE
COUNTY TO A PERSON OF LEGAL DRINKING AGE ON PREMISES THAT EITHER DO NOT
HAVE A LICENSE OR HAVE A TEMPORARY LICENSE ISSUED BY THE BOARD.
(3) To exercise the catering option, the license holder shall provide food at
the catered event.
(4) The license holder may exercise the catering option only during the
hours and days that the Board allows.
(5) AT EACH CATERED EVENT WHERE ALCOHOLIC BEVERAGES ARE
SERVED, THE HOLDER OF THE CATERING OPTION SHALL:
(I) SUPPLY SERVICE PERSONNEL, INCLUDING BARTENDERS
AND WAIT STAFF;
(II) ENSURE THAT THE SERVICE PERSONNEL ARE PRESENT AT
ALL TIMES DURING THE CATERED EVENT; AND
(III) HAVE AT LEAST ONE PERSON AT THE CATERED EVENT WHO
IS CERTIFIED BY AN ALCOHOL AWARENESS PROGRAM UNDER § 4–505 OF THIS
ARTICLE.
(d) The license may not be issued for use by a drugstore.
(e) The annual license fees are:
(1) $350 for a 6–day license without a catering option;
(2) $475 for a 6–day license with a catering option;
(3) $410 for a 7–day license without a catering option; and
(4) $535 for a 7–day license with a catering option.
(f) The Board shall charge a one–time issuing fee for a new license in an amount
equal to the annual license fee.
– 13 –

Ch. 827 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
21–902.
(a) There is a Class B beer, wine, and liquor license.
(b) The Board shall deny an application for a license under this section if the
Board determines that the business to be operated under this license will not enhance
recreational, business, and economic development in the county.
(c) The Board may issue the license for use by a hotel or motel that:
(1) is an establishment to accommodate the public by providing customary
hotel or motel services;
(2) has at least 10 rooms; and
(3) has a lobby with a registration and mail desk and seating facilities.
(d) The Board may issue the license for use by a restaurant that:
(1) has seating at tables, not including seats at bars or counters, for at least
20 individuals; and
(2) can prepare and serve full–course meals for at least 20 individuals at
one seating.
(e) The license authorizes the license holder to sell at a hotel, motel, or restaurant
at retail at the place described in the license:
(1) beer, wine, and liquor for on–premises consumption; and
(2) beer for off–premises consumption.
(f) (1) The catering option authorizes the license holder to sell beer, wine, and
liquor for consumption at events catered by the license holder [in the county] off the
licensed premises ANYWHERE IN THE COUNTY TO A PERSON OF LEGAL DRINKING AGE
ON PREMISES THAT EITHER DO NOT HAVE A LICENSE OR HAVE A TEMPORARY
LICENSE ISSUED BY THE BOARD.
(2) A license holder providing alcoholic beverages at a catered event off the
licensed premises shall also provide food.
(3) The license holder may exercise catering privileges only during hours
and days that are authorized under the Class B license.
– 14 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 827
(4) AT EACH CATERED EVENT WHERE ALCOHOLIC BEVERAGES ARE
SERVED, THE HOLDER OF THE CATERING OPTION SHALL:
(I) SUPPLY SERVICE PERSONNEL, INCLUDING BARTENDERS
AND WAIT STAFF;
(II) ENSURE THAT THE SERVICE PERSONNEL ARE PRESENT AT
ALL TIMES DURING THE CATERED EVENT; AND
(III) HAVE AT LEAST ONE PERSON AT THE CATERED EVENT WHO
IS CERTIFIED BY AN ALCOHOL AWARENESS PROGRAM UNDER § 4–505 OF THIS
ARTICLE.
(g) The annual license fees are:
(1) $1,500 for a 6–day license without the catering option;
(2) $2,000 for a 6–day license with the catering option;
(3) $1,750 for a 7–day license without the catering option; and
(4) $2,250 for a 7–day license with the catering option.
(h) The Board shall charge a one–time issuing fee for a new license in an amount
equal to the annual license fee.
21–903.
(a) There is a Class BDR (deluxe restaurant) beer, wine, and liquor license.
(b) The Board may issue the license to a holder of:
(1) any Class B alcoholic beverages license issued by the Board; or
(2) an equivalent license that the local licensing board of a different
jurisdiction issues only for use by a restaurant.
(c) (1) The Board may issue the license for use by a deluxe restaurant as
defined by the Board with:
(i) seating at tables, not including seats at bars or counters, for at
least 20 individuals; and
(ii) a capital investment of at least $250,000 for the restaurant
facilities, not including the cost of land or buildings.
– 15 –

Ch. 827 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(2) If an applicant purchases or leases an existing building, the capital
investment attributable to the cost of the land and improvements shall be based on the
assessed value of the land and improvements in accordance with the records of the State
Department of Assessments and Taxation at the time of purchase or lease.
(3) The license authorizes the license holder to sell, at retail, at the place
described in the license:
(i) beer, wine, and liquor for on–premises consumption; and
(ii) beer for off–premises consumption.
(d) (1) A license holder of a Class BDR license may acquire a catering option
that authorizes the license holder to sell beer, wine, and liquor for consumption at events
catered by the license holder [in the county] off the licensed premises ANYWHERE IN THE
COUNTY TO A PERSON OF LEGAL DRINKING AGE ON PREMISES THAT EITHER DO NOT
HAVE A LICENSE OR HAVE A TEMPORARY LICENSE ISSUED BY THE BOARD.
(2) A license holder providing alcoholic beverages at a catered event off the
licensed premises shall also provide food.
(3) The license holder may exercise catering privileges only during hours
and days that are authorized under the Class B license.
(4) AT EACH CATERED EVENT WHERE ALCOHOLIC BEVERAGES ARE
SERVED, THE HOLDER OF THE CATERING OPTION SHALL:
(I) SUPPLY SERVICE PERSONNEL, INCLUDING BARTENDERS
AND WAIT STAFF;
(II) ENSURE THAT THE SERVICE PERSONNEL ARE PRESENT AT
ALL TIMES DURING THE CATERED EVENT; AND
(III) HAVE AT LEAST ONE PERSON AT THE CATERED EVENT WHO
IS CERTIFIED BY AN ALCOHOL AWARENESS PROGRAM UNDER § 4–505 OF THIS
ARTICLE.
(e) The annual license fees are:
(1) $2,250 for a 6–day license without a catering option;
(2) $2,750 for a 6–day license with a catering option;
(3) $2,625 for a 7–day license without a catering option; and
– 16 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 827
(4) $3,125 for a 7–day license with a catering option.
(f) The Board shall charge a one–time issuing fee for a new license in an amount
equal to the annual license fee.
21–903.1.
(a) There is a Class BDR–DC (deluxe complex restaurant) beer, wine, and liquor
license.
(b) The Board may issue the license to a holder of:
(1) any Class B alcoholic beverages license issued by the Board; or
(2) an equivalent license that the local licensing board of a different
jurisdiction issues only for use by a restaurant.
(c) (1) The Board may issue the license for use by a deluxe complex restaurant,
as defined in the regulations of the Board, with:
(i) seating at tables, not including seats at bars or counters, for at
least 20 individuals; and
(ii) a capital investment of at least $250,000 for the restaurant
facilities, not including the cost of land or buildings.
(2) If an applicant purchases or leases an existing building, the capital
investment attributable to the cost of the land and improvements shall be based on the
assessed value of the land and improvements in accordance with the records of the State
Department of Assessments and Taxation at the time of purchase or lease.
(3) The license authorizes the license holder to sell, at retail, at the place
described in the license:
(i) beer, wine, and liquor for on–premises consumption; and
(ii) beer for off–premises consumption.
(d) (1) A license holder of a Class BDR–DC (deluxe complex restaurant) license
may acquire a catering option that authorizes the license holder to sell beer, wine, and
liquor for consumption at events catered by the license holder [in the county] off the
licensed premises ANYWHERE IN THE COUNTY TO A PERSON OF LEGAL DRINKING AGE
ON PREMISES THAT EITHER DO NOT HAVE A LICENSE OR HAVE A TEMPORARY
LICENSE ISSUED BY THE BOARD.
– 17 –

Ch. 827 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(2) A license holder providing alcoholic beverages at a catered event off the
licensed premises shall also provide food.
(3) The license holder may exercise catering privileges only during hours
and days that are authorized under the Class B license.
(4) AT EACH CATERED EVENT WHERE ALCOHOLIC BEVERAGES ARE
SERVED, THE HOLDER OF THE CATERING OPTION SHALL:
(I) SUPPLY SERVICE PERSONNEL, INCLUDING BARTENDERS
AND WAIT STAFF;
(II) ENSURE THAT THE SERVICE PERSONNEL ARE PRESENT AT
ALL TIMES DURING THE CATERED EVENT; AND
(III) HAVE AT LEAST ONE PERSON AT THE CATERED EVENT WHO
IS CERTIFIED BY AN ALCOHOL AWARENESS PROGRAM UNDER § 4–505 OF THIS
ARTICLE.
(e) The annual license fees are:
(1) $2,250 for a 6–day license without a catering option;
(2) $2,750 for a 6–day license with a catering option;
(3) $2,625 for a 7–day license without a catering option; and
(4) $3,125 for a 7–day license with a catering option.
(f) The Board shall:
(1) charge a one–time issuing fee for a new license in an amount equal to
the annual license fee; and
(2) adopt regulations to carry out this section.
21–905.
(a) (1) There is:
(i) a Class D (75% on–sale) beer, wine, and liquor license; and
(ii) a Class D (75% off–sale) beer, wine, and liquor license.
– 18 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 827
(2) The Board may not issue a license under this section to a grocery store
whose primary business is to sell food at retail to the public for off–premises consumption.
(b) The Board shall issue the license for on–premises consumption for use by an
establishment whose total beer, wine, and liquor sales are at least 75% on–premises
consumption and not more than 25% off–premises consumption.
(c) The Board shall issue the license for off–sale consumption for use by an
establishment whose total beer, wine, and liquor sales are at least 75% off–premises
consumption and not more than 25% on–premises consumption.
(d) (1) A holder of the license with a catering option may sell beer, wine, and
liquor for consumption at events that the holder caters off the licensed premises during the
hours and days that the Board allows.
(2) The license holder shall provide food if the license holder provides
alcoholic beverages at a catered event off the licensed premises ANYWHERE IN THE
COUNTY TO A PERSON OF LEGAL DRINKING AGE ON PREMISES THAT EITHER DO NOT
HAVE A LICENSE OR HAVE A TEMPORARY LICENSE ISSUED BY THE BOARD.
(3) AT EACH CATERED EVENT WHERE ALCOHOLIC BEVERAGES ARE
SERVED, THE HOLDER OF THE CATERING OPTION SHALL:
(I) SUPPLY SERVICE PERSONNEL, INCLUDING BARTENDERS
AND WAIT STAFF;
(II) ENSURE THAT THE SERVICE PERSONNEL ARE PRESENT AT
ALL TIMES DURING THE CATERED EVENT; AND
(III) HAVE AT LEAST ONE PERSON AT THE CATERED EVENT WHO
IS CERTIFIED BY AN ALCOHOL AWARENESS PROGRAM UNDER § 4–505 OF THIS
ARTICLE.
(e) The annual license fees are:
(1) $1,500 for a 6–day (on–sale) license without a catering option;
(2) $2,000 for a 6–day (on–sale) license with a catering option;
(3) $3,000 for a 6–day (off–sale) license;
(4) $1,750 for a 7–day (on–sale) license without a catering option;
(5) $2,250 for a 7–day (on–sale) license with a catering option; and
– 19 –

Ch. 827 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(6) $3,500 for a 7–day (off–sale) license.
(f) The Board shall charge a one–time issuing fee for a new license in an amount
equal to the annual license fee.
21–1002.1.
(a) There is a Class B–resort beer and wine license.
(b) The Board may issue the license to a license holder for a complex that has at
least two facilities that are:
(1) located on the same contiguous property;
(2) separated by at least 150 feet from the main area of the licensed
premises; and
(3) determined by the Board to be hotel, motel, recreational, or restaurant
facilities.
(c) The license authorizes the license holder to sell at a hotel, motel, recreational,
or restaurant facility at retail at the place described in the license:
(1) beer and wine for on–premises consumption; and
(2) beer for off–premises consumption.
(d) The license holder may sell beer and wine during the hours and days as set
out for a Class B beer and wine license under § 21–2003 of this title.
(e) (1) THE BOARD MAY ISSUE THE LICENSE WITH OR WITHOUT A
CATERING OPTION.
(2) A LICENSE HOLDER WITH A CATERING OPTION MAY SELL
ALCOHOLIC BEVERAGES FOR CONSUMPTION AT EVENTS CATERED BY THE LICENSE
HOLDER OFF THE LICENSED PREMISES ANYWHERE IN THE COUNTY TO A PERSON OF
LEGAL DRINKING AGE ON PREMISES THAT EITHER DO NOT HAVE A LICENSE OR HAVE
A TEMPORARY LICENSE ISSUED BY THE BOARD.
(3) A LICENSE HOLDER PROVIDING ALCOHOLIC BEVERAGES AT A
CATERED EVENT OFF THE LICENSED PREMISES SHALL ALSO PROVIDE FOOD.
(4) THE LICENSE HOLDER MAY EXERCISE CATERING PRIVILEGES
ONLY DURING HOURS AND DAYS THAT ARE AUTHORIZED UNDER THE CLASS B
LICENSE.
– 20 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 827
(5) AT EACH CATERED EVENT WHERE ALCOHOLIC BEVERAGES ARE
SERVED, THE HOLDER OF THE CATERING OPTION SHALL:
(I) SUPPLY SERVICE PERSONNEL, INCLUDING BARTENDERS
AND WAIT STAFF;
(II) ENSURE THAT THE SERVICE PERSONNEL ARE PRESENT AT
ALL TIMES DURING THE CATERED EVENT; AND
(III) HAVE AT LEAST ONE PERSON AT THE CATERED EVENT WHO
IS CERTIFIED BY AN ALCOHOL AWARENESS PROGRAM UNDER § 4–505 OF THIS
ARTICLE.
(F) The annual license fees are:
(1) $700 for a 6–day license for two facilities;
(2) $350 for each additional facility for a 6–day license;
(3) $820 for a 7–day license for two facilities; and
(4) $410 for each additional facility for a 7–day license.
[(f)] (G) The Board shall charge a one–time issuing fee for a new license in an
amount equal to the annual license fee.
21–1201.
(a) There is a local caterer’s license.
(b) (1) The Board may issue the license to a person that:
(i) has facilities to prepare and deliver food to the site of a catered
event;
(ii) obtains approval of the facilities from the county Department of
Health; and
(iii) does not hold any other license that the Board issues.
(2) A license holder is not required to have a banquet hall.
(c) The license authorizes a holder to:
– 21 –

Ch. 827 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(1) sell or provide off–sale alcoholic beverages during a catered event; and
(2) exercise the privileges of the license only during the hours and on the
days that are authorized for a Class B beer, wine, and liquor license.
(d) A LICENSE HOLDER MAY SERVE ALCOHOLIC BEVERAGES AT A CATERED
EVENT ANYWHERE IN THE COUNTY TO A PERSON OF LEGAL DRINKING AGE ON
PREMISES THAT EITHER DO NOT HAVE A LICENSE OR HAVE A TEMPORARY LICENSE
ISSUED BY THE BOARD.
(E) The license holder may not:
(1) hold a catered event that the license holder sponsors; or
(2) provide only alcoholic beverages at a catered event.
[(e)] (F) The license holder shall:
(1) purchase all alcoholic beverages from a wholesaler or retail dealer
licensed to sell alcoholic beverages in the county;
(2) contract for and provide food for consumption at the catered event;
(3) SUPPLY SERVICE PERSONNEL, INCLUDING BARTENDERS AND
WAIT STAFF;
(4) ENSURE THAT THE SERVICE PERSONNEL ARE PRESENT AT ALL
TIMES DURING THE CATERED EVENT;
(5) ENSURE THAT THE SALE OF FOOD REPRESENTS AT LEAST 70% OF
THE TOTAL COST OF THE CATERED EVENT;
[(3)] (6) during the catered event, ensure that at least one individual on
the site is certified by an alcohol awareness program under § 4–505 of this article; and
[(4)] (7) at the end of the catered event, return all containers of alcoholic
beverages that are not empty to the license holder’s principal place of business.
[(f)] (G) (1) The issuing fee that is charged for each new license is $500.
(2) The annual license fee is $500.
21–1408.
– 22 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 827
(a) At the time an application for an alcoholic beverages license is filed, at least
one of the applicants shall be a resident of the State.
(b) AN APPLICANT FOR A LICENSE IN THE COUNTY SHALL INCLUDE ON THE
APPLICATION:
(1) A STATEMENT INDICATING WHETHER THE APPLICANT IS A
NATURAL–BORN CITIZEN OR A NATURALIZED CITIZEN; OR
(2) IF THE APPLICANT IS NOT A CITIZEN OF THE UNITED STATES:
(I) A STATEMENT THAT THE APPLICANT’S IMMIGRATION
STATUS IS IN COMPLIANCE WITH FEDERAL LAW; AND
(II) EVIDENCE TO VERIFY THE IMMIGRATION STATUS OF THE
APPLICANT.
(C) The license remains valid only for as long as at least one of the applicants
remains a resident of the State.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2026.
Approved by the Governor, May 26, 2026.
– 23 –